it: Tipo di combustibile da fornello compatibile: Alcol; Cartuccia di butano; Carburante in gel; Bombola di isobutano/propano; Multicombustibile liquido; Bombola di propano; Pastiglia di combustibile solido; Gas bianco; Legna da ardere; Altro
zh-CN: 适用炉灶燃料类型: 酒精; 丁烷气罐; 凝胶燃料; 异丁烷/丙烷气罐; 液体多燃料; 丙烷气瓶; 固体燃料片; 白汽油; 木柴; 其他
ja: 対応ストーブ燃料タイプ: アルコール; ブタンカートリッジ; ジェル燃料; イソブタン/プロパンボンベ; 液体多燃料; プロパンガスボンベ; 固形燃料タブレット; ホワイトガソリン; 薪; その他
sl-SI: Združljiva vrsta goriva za štedilnik: Alkohol; Butanska kartuša; Gel gorivo; Pločevinka z izobutanom/propanom; Liquid večgorivo; Propanska jeklenka; Tableta za trdo gorivo; Beli plin; Kurjenje na drva; Druga
pt-PT: Tipo de combustível para fogão compatível: Álcool; Cartucho de butano; Combustível em gel; Recipiente de isobutano/propano; Multicombustível líquido; Botija de propano; Pastilha de combustível sólido; Gás branco; Queima de madeira; Outro
da: Kompatibel brændstoftype til komfur: Alkohol; Butanpatron; Gelbrændstof; Isobutan-/propanbeholder; Flydende multibrændstof; Propangasflaske; Tablet med fast brændstof; Hvid gas; Brændefyring; Andet
pl: Zgodny typ paliwa do kuchenki: Alkohol; Kartridż butanowy; Paliwo żelowe; Pojemnik z izobutanem/propanem; Płynne wielopaliwowe; Butla propanowa; Tabletka paliwowa stała; Biała benzyna; Na drewno; Pozostałe
en: Compatible stove fuel type: Alcohol; Butane cartridge; Gel fuel; Isobutane/propane canister; Liquid multi-fuel; Propane cylinder; Solid fuel tablet; White gas; Wood-burning; Other
zh-TW: 相容爐具燃料類型: 乙醇; 丁烷燃料罐; 凝膠燃料; 異丁烷/丙烷罐; 多種液態燃料; 丙烷鋼瓶; 固態燃料錠; 去漬油; 燃燒木材; 其他
cs: Typ kompatibilního paliva pro sporák: Alkohol; Butanová kartuše; Hořlavá pasta; Isobutan/propanová kartuše; Více druhů kapalných paliv; Propanová kartuše; Tuhý líh; Čistý benzín; Dřevo; Jiné
sv: Kompatibel spisbränsletyp: Alkohol; Butanpatron; Gelbränsle; Isobutan/propan-behållare; Flytande multibränsle; Propancylinder; Fast bränsletablett; Vitgas; Vedeldning; Övrigt
nl: Compatibel type kachelbrandstof: Alcohol; Butaanpatroon; Gelbrandstof; Isobutaan/propaanbus; Vloeibare multi-fuel; Propaancilinder; Vaste-brandstoftablet; Wasbenzine; Houtverbranding; Overig
hr-HR: Kompatibilna vrsta goriva za štednjak: Alkohol; Uložak s butanom; Gel gorivo; Spremnik izobutana/propana; Više tekućih goriva; Boca s propanom; Tableta za kruto gorivo; Bijeli plin; Loženje drva; Ostalo
fi: Yhteensopiva lieden polttoaineen tyyppi: Alkoholi; Butaanisäiliö; Geelipolttoaine; Isobutaani-/propaanisäiliö; Nestemäinen monipolttoaine; Propaanipullo; Kiinteä polttoainetabletti; Retkikeitinbensiini; Puukäyttöinen; Muu
ru: Совместимый тип топлива плиты: Спирт; Бутановый картридж; Гелевое топливо; Баллон с изобутаном/пропаном; Для различных видов жидкого топлива; Баллон с пропаном; Твердотопливная таблетка; Белый газ; Дровяное отопление; Другое
ko: 호환 스토브 연료 유형: 알코올; 부탄 카트리지; 겔 연료; 이소부탄/프로판 가스통; 액체 멀티 연료; 프로판 가스통; 고체 연료 정제; 화이트 가솔린; 우드버닝; 기타
ro-RO: Tip combustibil pentru sobă compatibil: Alcool; Cartuș de butan; Combustibil gel; Canistră cu izobutan/propan; Combustibil lichid multi-fuel; Butelie de propan; Tabletă de combustibil solid; Benzină albă; Ardere pe lemne; Altele
fr: Type de combustible compatible pour réchaud portable: Alcool; Cartouche de butane; Combustible en gel; Cartouche isobutane/propane; Combustible liquide multi-usage; Bouteille de propane; Comprimé de combustible solide; Essence blanche; Chauffage au bois; Autre
tr: Uyumlu ocak yakıt türü: Alkol; Bütan kartuşu; Jel yakıt; İzobütan / propan kartuşu; Sıvı çoklu yakıt; Propan tüpü; Katı yakıt tableti; Beyaz gaz; Odunlu; Diğer
el: Συμβατός τύπος καυσίμου κουζίνας: Οινόπνευμα; Φυσίγγιο βουτανίου; Καύσιμο σε μορφή γέλης; Δοχείο ισοβουτανίου/προπανίου; Υγρό καύσιμο πολλαπλών τύπων; Φιάλη προπανίου; Ταμπλέτα στερεού καυσίμου; Λευκή βενζίνη (white gas); Καύση ξύλου; Άλλο
sk-SK: Kompatibilný typ paliva do kachlí: Alkohol; Butánová kartuša; Gélové palivo; Kanister s izobutánom/propánom; Kvapalné viacdruhové palivo; Propánová fľaša; Tableta tuhého paliva; Čistý benzín; Na drevo; Iné
pt-BR: Tipo de combustível de fogão compatível: Álcool; Cartucho de butano; Combustível em gel; Recipiente de isobutano/propano; Multicombustível líquido; Cilindro de propano; Pastilha de combustível sólido; Gás branco; Queima de madeira; Outro
vi: Loại nhiên liệu bếp tương thích: Cồn; Bình ga butan mini; Nhiên liệu dạng gel; Bình nhiên liệu isobutan/propan; Nhiên liệu lỏng đa năng; Bình ga propan; Viên nhiên liệu rắn; Xăng trắng; Đốt củi; Khác
lt-LT: Suderinamas viryklės kuro tipas: Alkoholis; Butano kasetė; Gelio kuras; Izobutano/propano balionėlis; Skystas daugiafunkcis kuras; Propano balionas; Kietojo kuro tabletė; Baltosios dujos; Malkomis kūrenama; Kita
bg-BG: Съвместим тип гориво за печка: Алкохол; Бутанов патрон; Гел гориво; Бутилка с изобутан/пропан; Течно мултигориво; Пропанова бутилка; Таблетка за твърдо гориво; Газ за горене; За горене на дърва; Друго
es: Tipo de combustible para estufa compatible: Alcohol; Cartucho de butano; Combustible en gel; Bombona de isobutano/propano; Líquido combustible; Cilindro de propano; Pastilla de combustible sólido; Gas blanco; Leña para quemar; Otros
de: Kompatibler Brennstofftyp für Kocher: Alkohol; Butankartusche; Gel-Brennstoff; Isobutan-/Propangasflasche; Multifuel; Propangaskartusche; Trockenbrennstoff-Tabletten; Weißgas; Holzverbrennung; Sonstiges
nb: Kompatibel brennstofftype for komfyr: Alkohol; Butanpatron; Geldrivstoff; Isobutan/propan-beholder; Liquid multidrivstoff; Propansylinder; Tablett for fast brensel; hvit gass; Vedfyring; Annet
th: ประเภทเชื้อเพลิงสำหรับเตาที่ใช้งานร่วมกันได้: แอลกอฮอล์; แก๊สกระป๋องบิวเทน; เชื้อเพลิงเจล; แก๊สกระป๋องไอโซบิวเทน/โพรเพน; เชื้อเพลิงเหลวหลายชนิด; ถังแก๊สโพรเพน; เม็ดเชื้อเพลิงแข็ง; เบนซินขาว; ฟืน; อื่นๆ
hu: Kompatibilis tűzhely üzemanyagtípusa: Alkohol; Butánpatron; Gél üzemanyag; Izobután/propán tartály; Különböző folyékony tüzelőanyag; Propán palack; Szilárd tüzelőanyag-tabletta; Fehér gáz; Fatüzelésű; Egyéb